Alaska statutes. Title 47. Welfare, Social Services, and Institutions.
Article 3. Uniform Act for the Extradition of Persons of Unsound Mind.

Sec. 47.30.410.
Persons subject to extradition.

A person alleged to be of unsound mind found in this state, who has fled from another state, shall, on demand of the executive authority of the state from which the person fled, be delivered up to be removed to the state where, at the time of the flight the person

was under detention by law in a hospital, asylum, or other institution for the insane as a person of unsound mind;

had been determined by legal proceedings to be of unsound mind, the finding being unreversed and in full force and effect, and the control of the person having been acquired by a court of competent jurisdiction of the state from which the person fled; or

was subject to detention in that state, which was then the person’s legal domicile (personal service of process having been made) based on legal proceedings there pending to have the person declared of unsound mind.

History.

(§ 51-4-22 ACLA 1949)

Sec. 47.30.420.
Extradition proceedings.

If the executive authority of a state demands of the executive authority of this state a fugitive under AS

47.30.410

and produces a copy of the commitment decree or other judicial process and proceedings, certified as authentic by the governor or chief magistrate of the state from which the person so charged has fled, with an affidavit made before a proper officer showing the person to be a fugitive, the executive authority of this state shall have the fugitive apprehended and secured, if found in this state, and have immediate notice of the apprehension given to the executive authority making the demand, or to the agent of that authority appointed to receive the fugitive, and have the fugitive delivered to the agent when the agent appears.
If no agent appears within 30 days from the time of the apprehension the fugitive may be discharged.
All costs and expenses incurred in the apprehending, securing, maintaining, and transmitting the fugitive to the state making the demand shall be paid by that state.
An agent so appointed who receives the fugitive into custody is empowered to transmit the fugitive to the state from which the fugitive fled.
The executive authority of this state may, on the application of a person interested, demand the return to this state of a fugitive under AS

47.30.410

—

47.30.460

.

History.

(§ 51-4-23 ACLA 1949)

Sec. 47.30.430.
Time to commence proceedings.

All proceedings under AS

47.30.410

—

47.30.460

shall be begun within one year after the flight referred to in AS

47.30.410

.

History.

(§ 51-4-24 ACLA 1949)

Sec. 47.30.440.
Interpretation and construction.

AS

47.30.410

—

47.30.460

shall be so interpreted and construed as to effectuate its general purpose to make uniform the law of those states that enact it.

History.

(§ 51-4-25 ACLA 1949)

Sec. 47.30.450.
Definitions.

In AS

47.30.410

—

47.30.460

“executive authority,” “governor,” and “chief magistrate,” respectively, as applied to a request to return a person under AS

47.30.410

—

47.30.460

to or from the District of Columbia, include a justice of the supreme court of the District of Columbia and other authority;

“flight” and “fled” mean a voluntary or involuntary departure from the jurisdiction of the court where the proceedings mentioned in AS

47.30.410

—

47.30.460

have been instituted and are still pending, with the effect of avoiding, impeding, or delaying the action of the court in which the proceedings have been instituted or are pending, or a voluntary or involuntary departure from the state where the person demanded then was, if the person then was under detention by law as a person of unsound mind and subject to detention;

“state” includes states, territories, districts, and insular and other possessions of the United States.

History.

(§ 51-4-21 ACLA 1949)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1990 this section was reorganized to alphabetize the terms defined, at which time paragraph (1) was rewritten to conform to the style of the Alaska Statutes.

Sec. 47.30.460.
Short title.

AS

47.30.410

—

47.30.460

may be cited as the Uniform Act for the Extradition of Persons of Unsound Mind.

History.

(§ 51-4-26 ACLA 1949)